California, session 20252026, AB2170.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21080.1. (a) (1) The lead agency shall be responsible for determining whether the project is exempt from this division and whether an environmental impact report, a negative declaration, or a mitigated negative declaration shall be required for any project that is subject to this division. That determination shall be final and conclusive on all persons, including responsible agencies, unless challenged as provided in Section 21167.(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an environmental impact report, a negative declaration, or a mitigated negative declaration shall be required required, as determined by the lead agency, for any project that includes the development, operation, substantial modification to, intensification, or substantial expansion of, a project on land that is zoned to allow industrial uses and is of an industrial use if the project is located in or within one-half mile of an overburdened community.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the projects described in subparagraph (A) do not qualify for a statutory exemption under this division and are not eligible for a ministerial review process.(C) This paragraph does not apply to a project that is eligible for a categorical exemption pursuant to the guidelines adopted pursuant to Sections 21083 and 21084, a project that is eligible for exemption from this division, or a ministerial approval pursuant to Public Utilities Commission General Order 131-E or any successor order.(C)(D) This paragraph does not alter the requirements or standards set forth in Sections 65098, 65098.1, 65098.1.5, 65098.2, 65098.2.5, 65098.2.7, 65098.3, 65098.4, 65098.5, 65098.6, 65098.7, 65098.8, or 65098.9 of the Government Code.(D)(E) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “overburdened community” means a disadvantaged community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, a disadvantaged unincorporated community as defined in Section 65302.10 of the Government Code, or a census tract that has a pollution burden score that is within the highest 15 percent of CalEnviroScreen pollution burden scores.(ii) For purposes of this paragraph “CalEnviroScreen” means the California Communities Environmental Health Screening Tool that is used to identify disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) (1) If a proposed housing development project would otherwise be exempt from this division pursuant to a statutory exemption, or categorical exemption pursuant to Class 1 to 5, inclusive, 12, 15, 20, 27, 30, or 32 that is adopted before January 1, 2026, but for a single condition detailed in the statutory exemption or in Section 15300.2, 15301, 15302, 15303, 15304, 15305, 15312, 15315, 15320, 15322, 15327, 15330, or 15332 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable, the application of this division to the approval of the proposed housing development project shall be limited to effects upon the environment that are caused solely by that single condition.(2) An initial study or environmental impact report prepared for a housing development project subject to this subdivision is only required to examine those effects that the lead agency determines, based upon substantial evidence in the record, are caused solely by the single condition that makes the proposed housing development project ineligible for the statutory exemption or categorical exemption.(3) An environmental impact report for a housing development project subject to this subdivision is not required to include any discussion of alternatives to the housing development project or the growth-inducing impacts of the housing development project.(4) This subdivision does not apply to any of the following housing development projects:(A) A proposed housing development project that is not similar in kind to the projects listed in the statutory or categorical exemption.(B) A proposed housing development project that is ineligible for the statutory exemption or categorical exemption due to two or more conditions.(C) A proposed housing development project that includes a distribution center or oil and gas infrastructure.(D) (i) A proposed housing development project located on natural and protected lands, as defined pursuant to Section 21067.5.(ii) The definition of “natural and protected lands” described in clause (i) does not include the lands described in subdivision (o) of Section 21067.5.(E) A proposed housing development project located on a project site that includes habitat for protected species identified as a candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).(E)The(F) A proposed housing development project if the project site or the parcel size exceeds four acres, and either of the following occurred:(i) The project is a builder’s remedy project, as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.(ii) The project applicant applied pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code as it read before January 1, 2025.(5) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Condition” means a physical or regulatory feature of the project or its setting or an effect upon the environment caused by the project.(B) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.(c) In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the lead agency shall, upon the request of a potential applicant, provide for consultation before the filing of the application regarding the range of actions, potential alternatives, mitigation measures, and any potential and significant effects on the environment of the project.SEC. 2. Section 21083.04 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21083.04. (a) For purposes of this section, “threshold languages” means all languages spoken jointly by 5 percent or more of the population within the jurisdiction of the lead agency who do not speak English, or who are unable to effectively communicate in English because it is not their native language, consistent with the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act (Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).(b) On and after July 1, 2027, all of the following categories of documents and information notices prepared pursuant to this division shall be translated into all threshold languages in the city or county where the project is located to ensure meaningful involvement of all impacted people:(1)Executive summaries of environmental review documents.(2)Initial studies.(3)Mitigation and monitoring requirements.(4)Cumulative impacts analysis.(5)(1) Notices of public hearings or informational meetings regarding a proposed project, including, but not limited to, scoping meetings.(6)(2) Notices of exemption.(3) Notices of intent to adopt a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration.(7)(4) Notices of preparation. preparation of an environmental impact report.(8)(5) Notices of availability.(9)(6) Notices of completion.(10)(7) Notices of determination.(11)Statements of overriding considerations.(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall develop guidelines to implement the requirement in subdivision (b). The guidelines shall include guidance for the availability of timely requested translation equipment or services at any public hearing or meeting for which a notice is required to be translated.(2) The guidelines developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall allow lead agencies to develop a procedure for an interested party to request that interpretation services be made available at hearings or meetings and, if the lead agency develops that procedure, the lead agency may require mandatory interpretation services only when a request has been made in advance of the hearing or meeting.(d) The lead agency shall provide a notice of any public hearing for projects subject to this section Section 21080.1 to owners and occupants of property located within one-half mile of any parcel or parcels, and to any school located within one mile of any parcel or parcels, of a project site, not less than 60 30 days before the public hearing.(1) A notice provided under this subdivision shall include translations for all threshold languages spoken in the city or county.(2) A notice provided under this subdivision shall provide the date, time, and location of the public hearing, a description of the proposed project, a map indicating the location of the facility, how to submit a written comment, and any other information deemed appropriate by the lead agency.(3)(A)The lead agency shall make best efforts to secure a location for the public hearing within one-half mile of a public transit stop.(B)(3) If the public hearing is held on a weekday, the lead agency shall hold the public hearing between the hours of 5 p.m. to 9 p.m., inclusive.(4) (A) The public hearing shall have in-person participation and provide a remote participation option through either a web-based platform or by telephone.(B) The public hearing shall include oral translation services in all threshold languages spoken in the city or county, upon request. request, to the extent feasible.(e) A minor inaccuracy in the translation of a document notice or hearing required or provided pursuant to this section shall not be a basis for invalidation of a public agency decision, unless the inaccuracy is found to preclude informed decisionmaking or informed public participation, relevant information from being presented to the public, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 21005, and the guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall align with this prohibition. 21005.(f) A translation of notices made using a digital translation service satisfies the requirements of this section.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.